District of Columbia statutes.
8-1309

Suspension and revocation of permit.

(a)

(1)

The Mayor may suspend a permit issued in accordance with § 8-1303 if the holder of the permit is in violation of this chapter or the rules promulgated pursuant to the chapter.

(2)

Written notice of the suspension shall be served upon the affected party or the party’s designated agent.

(b)

(1)

Where a permit has been suspended, the person affected has the right to reapply for a permit.

(2)

If the person is able to demonstrate an ability and willingness to comply with the permit and with the provisions of this chapter and the rules, the Mayor may grant a new permit.

(c)

(1)

Where there is a history of repeated violations or where a permit has been previously suspended, the Mayor may revoke a permit, upon a showing of subsequent violation, and upon providing the affected party, or the party’s designated agent, with written notice of the intent to revoke the permit and with an opportunity for a hearing prior to revocation.

(2)

The revocation shall take effect 15 days after the notice has been given, unless a written request for a hearing is received by the Mayor within that period.

(d)

The Mayor may immediately revoke a permit upon an initial violation of the chapter or the rules where the violation presents an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health, the public welfare, or the environment.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 10, 24 DCR 6289
Aug. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-103, § 2(f), 31 DCR 3032
1973 Ed., § 6-529.
1981 Ed., § 6-709.